Washington statutes.
RCW 18.265.090

Limited license.

(1) The department shall issue a limited license to any applicant who, as determined by the secretary:

(a) Holds a valid license, certification, or recertification in another state, Canadian province, or has been certified or licensed by a federal or tribal governing board in the previous two years, that allows a substantially equivalent, but not the entire scope of practice in RCW 18.265.050;

(b) Is currently engaged in active practice in another state, Canadian province, or tribe;

(c) Files with the secretary documentation certifying that the applicant:

(i)(A) Has graduated from a dental therapy school accredited by the commission on dental accreditation; or

(B) Has graduated from a dental therapy education program before September 30, 2022, that the dental quality assurance commission determines is substantially equivalent to an accredited education program; and

(ii) Is licensed or certified to practice in another state or Canadian province, or has been certified or licensed by a federal or tribal governing board in the previous two years;

(d) Provides such information as the secretary deems necessary pertaining to the conditions and criteria of the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(e) Demonstrates to the secretary knowledge of Washington state law pertaining to the practice of dental therapy; and

(f) Pays any required fees.

(2) A person practicing with a limited license granted under this section has the authority to perform only those dental therapy procedures in RCW 18.265.050 that he or she was licensed or certified to practice in their previous state, tribe, or Canadian province.

(3) Upon demonstration of competency in all procedures in RCW 18.265.050, the limited license holder may apply for licensure as a dental therapist under RCW 18.265.030.

(4) The term of a limited license issued under this section is the same as the term for an initial limited license issued under *RCW 18.29.190.

(5) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement and administer this section.

[ 2023 c 460 s 11.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 18.29.190 was amended by 2023 c 211 s 1, changing "initial limited license" to "initial temporary license."

Effective date—2023 c 460 ss 1-22: See note following RCW 18.265.005.